Massachusetts, session 194th, H96.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 110H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following chapter:—
Chapter 110I. Regulation of biometric recognition technology
Section 1. Definitions
(a) As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, have the following meanings:—
''Agency'' , any agency, executive office, department, board, commission, bureau,
division or authority of the commonwealth, or any of its branches, or of any political subdivision
thereof.
of 8

“Abusive trade practice” , any conduct by a covered entity that 1) materially interferes
with the ability of an end user to understand a term or condition of the agreement between
covered entities and end users relating to biometric recognition technology or biometric data or
2) takes unreasonable advantage of: a) A lack of understanding on the part of the end user of the
material risks, costs, or conditions of the covered entity’s product or service that uses biometric
recognition technology; or b) The inability of the end user to protect their interests in selecting or
using a covered entity’s product or service; or c) The reasonable reliance by the end user on a
covered entity’s representation to act in the interests of the end user.
“Biometric data” means information that pertains to measurable biological or behavioral
characteristics of an individual that can be used singularly, or in combination with each other, or
with other information, for verification, recognition, or identification of an individual. Examples
include but are not limited to fingerprints, retina and iris patterns, voiceprints, D.N.A. sequences,
facial characteristics and face geometry, gait, handwriting, keystroke dynamics, and mouse
movements.
Biometric data does not include writing samples, written signatures, mere photographs,
human biological samples used for valid scientific testing or screening, demographic data, tattoo
descriptions, or physical descriptions such as height, weight, hair color, or eye color.
Biometric data does not include donated organs, tissues, parts of the human body, blood,
or serum stored on behalf of recipients or potential recipients of living or cadaveric transplants
obtained or stored by a federally designated organ procurement agency.
Biometric data does not include information captured from a patient by a health care
provider or health care facility, or collected, processed, used, or stored exclusively for medical
of 8

education or research, public health or epidemiological purposes, health care treatment, health
insurance, payment, or operations, so long as such information is protected under the federal
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and applicable federal and state
laws and regulations.
Biometric data does not include information captured from an X-ray, roentgen process,
computed tomography, M.R.I., P.E.T. scan, mammography, or other image or film of the human
anatomy used to diagnose, prognose, or treat an illness or other medical condition or to further
validate scientific testing or screening.
“Biometric recognition technology” , Technology that (i) analyzes biometric data; (ii) is
used to assign a unique, persistent identifier; or (iii) is used for the unique personal identification
of a specific individual.
“Consent” , any freely given, specific, informed and unambiguous indication of the
consumer's wishes by which he or she, or his or her legal guardian, by a person who has power
of attorney or is acting as a conservator for the consumer, such as by a statement or by a clear
affirmative action, signifies agreement to the processing of biometric data relating to the
consumer for a narrowly defined particular purpose. Acceptance of a general or broad terms of
use or similar document that contains descriptions of biometric data processing along with other,
unrelated information, does not constitute consent. Hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a
given piece of content does not constitute consent. Likewise, agreement obtained through use of
an abusive trade practice does not constitute consent.
“Controller” , Any covered entity that, alone or jointly with others, determines the
purposes and means of processing biometric data.
of 8

“Covered entity” , Any person, including corporate affiliates, that collects, stores, or
processes biometric data; provided, that the federal government or any state or local government,
law enforcement agency, national security agency or intelligence agency shall not be covered
entities.
“Data” , Any material upon which written, drawn, spoken, visual, or electromagnetic
information or images are recorded or preserved, regardless of physical form or characteristics.
“Deceptive data practice” , Any act or practice involving the processing or transfer of
covered data in a manner that constitutes a deceptive act or practice as described in section 2 of
chapter 93A.
“Electronic” , Relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless,
optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
“Encrypted” , Data that has been transformed according to procedures outlined in 45 CFR
§ 164.312(a)(2)(iv) and (e)(2)(ii) into a form in which there is a low probability of assigning
meaning without use of a confidential process or key, unless further defined by regulation of the
department of consumer affairs and business regulation.
“End user” , An individual providing biometric data to a covered entity.
“Harmful data practice” , The processing or transfer of covered data in a manner that
causes or is likely to cause: (1) financial, physical, or reputational injury to an individual; (2)
physical or other highly offensive intrusion upon the solitude or seclusion of an individual or the
individual’s private affairs or concerns, where such intrusion would be highly offensive to a
reasonable person; or (3) other substantial injury to an individual.
of 8

“Legal effect” , An effect that changes an entity or persons’ legal duties, liabilities,
obligations, benefits owed, protections granted by law, or ability to utilize legal remedies.
“Person” , A natural person, corporation, association, partnership or other legal entity.
“Personal information” , For purposes of this section, “personal information” means
biometric data.

“Unfair data practice” , The processing or transfer of covered data in a manner that
causes or is likely to cause substantial injury to end users which is not reasonably avoidable by
end users themselves and not outweighed by countervailing benefits to end users.
Section 2. Duties of loyalty, care, and confidentiality for covered entities
(a) A covered entity shall be prohibited from taking any actions with respect to
processing biometric data or designing biometric recognition technologies that conflict with an
end user’s best interests.
(b) A covered entity shall be required to secure biometric data from unauthorized access
in a reasonable manner that is the same as or more protective than the manner in which the
covered entity secures other confidential and sensitive data and shall be prohibited from
engaging in harmful data practices.
(c) A covered entity shall not: (i) process or transfer biometric data in any manner not
consented to by the end user; (ii) engage in the sale of biometric data to a third party; (iii)
disclose biometric data with any other person or entity except as consistent with the duties of
loyalty, care, and confidentiality under subsections 2(a), 2(b) and 2(c)(i) and 2(c)(ii),
of 8

respectively; or (iv) disclose or share biometric data with any other person unless that person
enters into a contract with the covered entity that imposes on the person the same duties of care,
loyalty, and confidentiality toward the end user as are imposed on the covered entity under this
subsection.
100 (d) A covered entity shall take reasonable steps to ensure that the practices of any person
101 to whom the online service provider discloses or sells, or with whom the online service provider
102 shares, biometric data fulfill the duties of care, loyalty, and confidentiality assumed by the
103 person under the contract described in subparagraph (c), including by auditing, on a regular
104 basis, the data security and data practices of any such person.
105 (e) A covered entity shall not discriminate against a consumer because of the withheld
106 consent under this title, including, but not limited to: (i) denying goods or services to the end
107 user; (ii) charging different prices or rates for goods or services, including through the use of
108 discounts or other benefits or imposing penalties; (iii) providing a different level or quality of
109 goods or services to the end user; (iv) suggesting that the end user will receive a different price
110 or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services.
111 Section 3. Regulating unfair, deceptive, and abusive biometric data practices
112 (a) A covered entity shall not: (i) engage in a deceptive data practice; (ii) engage in an
113 unfair data practice; or (iii) engage in an abusive trade practice.
114 (b) It is the intent of the legislature that in construing paragraph (a) of this section in
115 actions unfair and deceptive trade practices, the courts will be guided by the interpretations given
116 by the Federal Trade Commission and the Federal Courts to section 5(a)(1) of the Federal Trade
117 Commission Act (15 U.S.C. 45(a)(1)), as from time to time amended.
of 8

118 (c) The attorney general may make rules and regulations interpreting the provisions of
119 subsection 2(a) of this chapter.
120 Section 4. Limits on decision-making and public surveillance
121 (a) Covered entities shall not use biometric data to help make decisions that produce legal
122 effects or similarly significant effects concerning end users. Decisions that include legal effects
123 or similarly significant effects concerning end users include, without limitation, denial or
124 degradation of consequential services or support, such as financial or lending services, housing,
125 insurance, educational enrollment, criminal justice, employment opportunities, health care
126 services, and access to basic necessities, such as food and water.
127 (b) Covered entities may not operate, install, or commission the operation or installation
128 of equipment incorporating biometric recognition technology in any place, whether licensed or
129 unlicensed, which is open to and accepts or solicits the patronage of the general public.
130 (c) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this section are matters vitally
131 affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the Massachusetts Consumer Protection
132 law, chapter 93a. A violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the development and
133 preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair
134 method of competition for the purpose of applying the Massachusetts Consumer Protection law,
135 chapter 93a.
136 Section 5. Applicability of other state and federal laws
of 8

137 This chapter does not relieve a person or agency from the duty to comply with
138 requirements of any applicable general or special law or federal law regarding the protection and
139 privacy of personal information.
140 Section 6. Enforcement
141 The attorney general may bring an action pursuant to section 4 of chapter 93A against a
142 person or otherwise to remedy violations of this chapter and for other relief that may be
143 appropriate.
of 8